ladina.dic
aciēs/1,11500 po:subst is:fem
aetās/1,11311 po:subst is:fem al:aetātis st:aetās
aetātis/1,11301 po:subst is:fem al:aetās st:aetās
affectus/1,11400 po:subst is:masc
amor/1,11313 po:subst is:masc al:amōris st:amor
amōris/1,11303 po:subst is:masc al:amor st:amor
animal/1,11306 po:subst is:neutr
ars/1,11313 po:subst is:fem al:artis st:ars
artis/1,11303 po:subst is:fem al:ars st:ars
auris/1,11303 po:subst is:fem st:auris al:auris
auris/1,11313 po:subst is:fem st:auris al:auris
avis/1,11313,11303 po:subst is:fem st:auris
canis/1,11303,11313 po:subst is:masc is:fem
caput/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:capitis st:caput
capitis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:caput st:caput
carmen/1,11311 po:subst is:neutr al:carminis st:carmen
carminis/1,11301 po:subst is:neutr al:carmen st:carmen
civis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:civis st:civis
civis/1,11313 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:civis st:civis
cīvitās/1,11311 po:subst is:fem al:cīvitātis st:cīvitās
cīvitātis/1,11301 po:subst is:fem al:cīvitās st:cīvitās
comes/1,11311 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:comitis st:comes
comitis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:comes st:comes
cor/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:coris st:cor
coris/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:cor st:cor
cornū/1,11400 po:subst is:neutr
corpus/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:corporis st:corpus
corporis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:corpus st:corpus
crīmen/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:crīminis st:crīmen
crīminis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:crīmen st:crīmen
dēfectus/1,11400 po:subst is:masc
dens/1,11313 po:subst is:masc al:dentis: st:dens
dentis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc al:dens: st:dens
dux/1,11311 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:ducis st:dux
ducis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:dux st:dux
exemplar/1,11306 po:subst is:neutr
famis/1,11303 po:subst st:famēs al:famēs
famēs/1,11313 po:subst st:famēs al:famis
febris/1,11305,11315 po:subst is:fem st:febris
fīnis/1,11304,11314 po:subst is:masc
flōs/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:flōris st:flōs
flōris/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:flōs st:flōs
foedus/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:foederis st:foedus
foederis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:foedus st:foedus
fōns/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:fōntis st:fōns
fōntis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:fōns st:fōns
frāter/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:frātris st:frāter
frātris/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:frāter st:frāter
fulmen/1,11314 po:subst is:neutr al:fulminis st:fulmen
fulminis/1,11304 po:subst is:neutr al:fulmen st:fulmen
gēns/1,11311 po:subst is:fem al:genis st:gēns
genis/1,11301 po:subst is:fem al:gēns st:gēns
genus/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:generis st:genus
generis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:genus st:genus
hominis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:homō st:homō
homō/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:hominis st:homō
honor/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:honōris st:honor
honōris/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:honor st:honor
hospes/1,11311 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:hospitis st:hospes
hospitis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:hospes st:hospes
hostis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc al:hostis st:hostis
hostis/1,11313 po:subst is:masc al:hostis st:hostis
ignis/1,11313,11303 po:subst is:masc st:ignis
imperātor/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:imperātoris st:imperātor
imperātoris/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:imperātor st:imperātor
iter/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:itineris st:iter
itineris/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:iter st:iter
mare/1,11306 po:subst is:neutr
mēns/1,11313 po:subst is:masc al:mentis st:mēns
mentis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc al:mēns st:mēns
mōns/1,11313 po:subst is:masc al:montis st:mōns
montis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc al:mōns st:mōns
mors/1,11313 po:subst is:fem al:mortis st:mors
mortis/1,11303 po:subst is:fem al:mors st:mors
nōmen/1,11312 po:subst is:neutr al:nōminis st:nōmen
nōminis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:nōmen st:nōmen
pars/1,11311 po:subst is:fem al:partis st:pars
partis/1,11301 po:subst is:fem al:pars st:pars
pecus/1,11314 po:subst is:neutr al:pecoris st:pecus
pecoris/1,11304 po:subst is:neutr al:pecus st:pecus
pēs/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:pēdis st:pēs
pēdis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:pēs st:pēs
plēbs/1,11313 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:plēbis st:plēbs
plēbis/1,11303 po:subst is:masc is:fem al:plēbs st:plēbs
pons/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:pontis st:pons
pontis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:pons st:pons
portus/1,11400 po:subst is:masc
prīnceps/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:prīncipis st:prīnceps
prīncipis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:prīnceps st:prīnceps
pulsus/1,11400 po:subst is:masc
scelus/1,11313 po:subst is:neutr al:sceleris st:scelus
sceleris/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:scelus st:scelus
sitis/1,11305,11315 po:subst is:fem st:sitis
sōlis/1,11301 po:subst is:masc al:sōl st:sōl
sōl/1,11311 po:subst is:masc al:sōlis st:sōl
status/1,11400 po:adj is:masc
temporis/1,11302 po:subst is:neutr al:tempus st:tempus
tempus/1,11313 po:subst is:neutr al:temporis st:tempus
turris/1,11305,11315 po:subst is:fem st:turris
urbis/1,11303 po:subst is:fem al:urbs st:urbs
urbs/1,11313 po:subst is:fem al:urbis st:urbs
vestis/1,11303,11313 po:subst is:fem
vulnus/1,11314 po:subst is:neutr al:vulneris st:vulnus
vulneris/1,11304 po:subst is:neutr al:vulnus st:vulnus
